Tennessee, session 114, HB2062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-418(b), is amended by
deleting "one-half (1/2) ounce (14.175 grams)" and substituting "five (5) ounces (141.748
grams)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-418(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting the following:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (d) and (e), a violation of this section is a
Class A misdemeanor. Possession of less than five (5) ounces (141.748 grams) of
marijuana is punishable by a five-hundred-dollar fine for a first offense and a one-
thousand-dollar fine for a second or subsequent offense.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-417(g)(1), is amended by
deleting "one-half (1/2) ounce (14.175 grams)" and substituting "five (5) ounces (141.748
grams)".
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2062
011912
- 1 -